Tennessee, session 114, HB1918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, is amended by adding the following
new chapter:
38-4-101. Short title.
This chapter is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Private Workplace
Due Process and Warrant Protection Act."
38-4-102. Chapter definitions.
As used in this chapter:
HB1918
011298
- 1 -

(1) "Federal immigration authority" means any federal agency or officer
engaged in the civil enforcement of federal immigration law, including United
States immigration and customs enforcement;
(2) "Judicial warrant" means a warrant issued by a federal or state judge
or magistrate based on probable cause and specifically authorizing entry into a
private workplace;
(3) "Private workplace" means any business location, facility, or property
not open to the general public, including non-public work areas; and
(4) "State assistance" means the use of state or local personnel,
facilities, equipment, funds, databases, or participation in enforcement activity.
38-4-103. Warrant requirement for workplace entry.
(a) A state or local law enforcement agency shall not assist, participate in, or
facilitate any immigration enforcement action within a private workplace unless the
enforcing authority presents a valid judicial warrant authorizing entry.
(b) An administrative warrant, civil detainer, or notice issued by a federal
immigration authority does not satisfy the requirements of this section.
(c) An employee of a private workplace without actual authority over the
premises cannot consent to an enforcement action within a private workplace. Any such
consent is invalid.
38-4-104. Protection of business owners and employees.
(a) A business owner, manager, or employee shall not be penalized, cited, or
sanctioned under state or local law for refusing entry to a federal immigration authority
absent a judicial warrant.
(b) A state or local agency shall not retaliate against a business for exercising
rights under this chapter.
- 2 - 011298

38-4-105. Prohibition on state resource use.
A state or local agency shall not:
(1) Provide access to non-public business areas;
(2) Provide employee records or schedules; or
(3) Participate in questioning, detaining, or escorting individuals within a
private workplace for immigration enforcement purposes absent a judicial
warrant.
38-4-106. Notice of rights.
The department of labor and workforce development shall develop and distribute
a model workplace notice informing businesses and employees of their rights under this
chapter, including the right to refuse entry absent a judicial warrant.
38-4-107. Enforcement and remedies.
(a) Evidence obtained in violation of this chapter is inadmissible in any state or
local court proceeding.
(b) A business or individual aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may seek
declaratory or injunctive relief.
(c) This chapter does not create criminal liability for any law enforcement officer.
38-4-108. Construction.
This chapter does not:
(1) Prohibit federal immigration enforcement conducted pursuant to a
valid judicial warrant;
(2) Regulate federal officers directly; or
(3) Limit enforcement actions in areas of a business that are open to the
general public.
- 3 - 011298

SECTION 2. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 011298